spellchecker/hunspell/bak/bash (1).aff
FLAG num
SFX 202 0 ңдәгенеңдер . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөндәгенеңдер . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгенеңдер . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгенеңдер . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәгегәлер . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәгегәлер . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөндәгегәлер . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгегәлер . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгегәлер . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәгенелер . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәгенелер . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөндәгенелер . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгенелер . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгенелер . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәгенәндер . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәгенәндер . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөндәгенәндер . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгенәндер . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгенәндер . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәгеләлер . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәгеләлер . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөндәгеләлер . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгеләлер . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгеләлер . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәгенеңсе . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәгенеңсе . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөндәгенеңсе . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгенеңсе . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгенеңсе . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәгегәсе . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәгегәсе . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөндәгегәсе . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгегәсе . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгегәсе . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәгенесе . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәгенесе . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөндәгенесе . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгенесе . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгенесе . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәгенәнсе . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәгенәнсе . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөндәгенәнсе . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгенәнсе . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгенәнсе . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәгеләсе . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәгеләсе . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөндәгеләсе . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгеләсе . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгеләсе . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәгеме . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 202 0 ңдәгеме . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 202 0 һөндәгеме . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгеме . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгеме . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX 202 0 мдәгелер . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәгелер . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөндәгелер . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгелер . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгелер . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәгесе . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәгесе . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөндәгесе . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгесе . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгесе . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәгеләй . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 202 0 ңдәгеләй . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 202 0 һөндәгеләй . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгеләй . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгеләй . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX 202 0 мдәгесә . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 202 0 ңдәгесә . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 202 0 һөндәгесә . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгесә . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгесә . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX 202 0 мдәгеләйме . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 202 0 ңдәгеләйме . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 202 0 һөндәгеләйме . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгеләйме . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгеләйме . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX 202 0 мдәгесәме . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 202 0 ңдәгесәме . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 202 0 һөндәгесәме . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгесәме . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгесәме . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX 202 0 мдәгеләйҙер . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәгеләйҙер . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөндәгеләйҙер . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгеләйҙер . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгеләйҙер . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәгесәлер . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәгесәлер . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөндәгесәлер . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгесәлер . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгесәлер . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәгеләйсе . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәгеләйсе . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөндәгеләйсе . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгеләйсе . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгеләйсе . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәгесәсе . +PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәгесәсе . +PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөндәгесәсе . +PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙҙәгесәсе . +PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙҙәгесәсе . +PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мәсә . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса
SFX 202 0 ңәсә . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса
SFX 202 0 һөнәсә . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса
SFX 202 0 бөҙгәсә . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса
SFX 202 0 гөҙгәсә . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса
SFX 202 0 мәсәме . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 202 0 ңәсәме . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 202 0 һөнәсәме . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 202 0 бөҙгәсәме . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 202 0 гөҙгәсәме . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX 202 0 мәсәлер . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңәсәлер . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөнәсәлер . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙгәсәлер . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙгәсәлер . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX 202 0 мәсәсе . +PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңәсәсе . +PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөнәсәсе . +PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙгәсәсе . +PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙгәсәсе . +PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ммөн . +PxSg1+Pred1Sg
SFX 202 0 ммөнмө . +PxSg1+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 ммөндөр . +PxSg1+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 ммөнмөлөр . +PxSg1+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ммөнсө . +PxSg1+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мһөң . +PxSg1+Pred2Sg
SFX 202 0 мһөңмө . +PxSg1+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 мһөңдөр . +PxSg1+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 мһөңмөлөр . +PxSg1+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 мһөңсө . +PxSg1+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мбөҙ . +PxSg1+Pred1Pl
SFX 202 0 мбөҙмө . +PxSg1+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 мбөҙҙөр . +PxSg1+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 мбөҙмөлөр . +PxSg1+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 мбөҙсө . +PxSg1+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мһөгөҙ . +PxSg1+Pred2Pl
SFX 202 0 мһөгөҙмө . +PxSg1+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 мһөгөҙҙөр . +PxSg1+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 мһөгөҙмөлөр . +PxSg1+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 мһөгөҙсө . +PxSg1+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңмөн . +PxSg2+Pred1Sg
SFX 202 0 ңмөнмө . +PxSg2+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 ңмөндөр . +PxSg2+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңмөнмөлөр . +PxSg2+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңмөнсө . +PxSg2+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңһөң . +PxSg2+Pred2Sg
SFX 202 0 ңһөңмө . +PxSg2+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 ңһөңдөр . +PxSg2+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңһөңмөлөр . +PxSg2+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңһөңсө . +PxSg2+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңбөҙ . +PxSg2+Pred1Pl
SFX 202 0 ңбөҙмө . +PxSg2+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 ңбөҙҙөр . +PxSg2+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңбөҙмөлөр . +PxSg2+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңбөҙсө . +PxSg2+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңһөгөҙ . +PxSg2+Pred2Pl
SFX 202 0 ңһөгөҙмө . +PxSg2+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 ңһөгөҙҙөр . +PxSg2+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңһөгөҙмөлөр . +PxSg2+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңһөгөҙсө . +PxSg2+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөмөн . +PxSg3+Pred1Sg
SFX 202 0 һөмөнмө . +PxSg3+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 һөмөндөр . +PxSg3+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөмөнмөлөр . +PxSg3+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөмөнсө . +PxSg3+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөһөң . +PxSg3+Pred2Sg
SFX 202 0 һөһөңмө . +PxSg3+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 һөһөңдөр . +PxSg3+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөһөңмөлөр . +PxSg3+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөһөңсө . +PxSg3+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөбөҙ . +PxSg3+Pred1Pl
SFX 202 0 һөбөҙмө . +PxSg3+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 һөбөҙҙөр . +PxSg3+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөбөҙмөлөр . +PxSg3+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөбөҙсө . +PxSg3+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 һөһөгөҙ . +PxSg3+Pred2Pl
SFX 202 0 һөһөгөҙмө . +PxSg3+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 һөһөгөҙҙөр . +PxSg3+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөһөгөҙмөлөр . +PxSg3+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 һөһөгөҙсө . +PxSg3+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙмөн . +PxPl1+Pred1Sg
SFX 202 0 бөҙмөнмө . +PxPl1+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 бөҙмөндөр . +PxPl1+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙмөнмөлөр . +PxPl1+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙмөнсө . +PxPl1+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөң . +PxPl1+Pred2Sg
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөңмө . +PxPl1+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөңдөр . +PxPl1+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөңмөлөр . +PxPl1+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөңсө . +PxPl1+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙбөҙ . +PxPl1+Pred1Pl
SFX 202 0 бөҙбөҙмө . +PxPl1+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 бөҙбөҙҙөр . +PxPl1+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙбөҙмөлөр . +PxPl1+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙбөҙсө . +PxPl1+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөгөҙ . +PxPl1+Pred2Pl
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөгөҙмө . +PxPl1+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөгөҙҙөр . +PxPl1+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөгөҙмөлөр . +PxPl1+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 бөҙһөгөҙсө . +PxPl1+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙмөн . +PxPl2+Pred1Sg
SFX 202 0 гөҙмөнмө . +PxPl2+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 гөҙмөндөр . +PxPl2+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙмөнмөлөр . +PxPl2+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙмөнсө . +PxPl2+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөң . +PxPl2+Pred2Sg
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөңмө . +PxPl2+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөңдөр . +PxPl2+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөңмөлөр . +PxPl2+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөңсө . +PxPl2+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙбөҙ . +PxPl2+Pred1Pl
SFX 202 0 гөҙбөҙмө . +PxPl2+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 гөҙбөҙҙөр . +PxPl2+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙбөҙмөлөр . +PxPl2+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙбөҙсө . +PxPl2+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөгөҙ . +PxPl2+Pred2Pl
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөгөҙмө . +PxPl2+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөгөҙҙөр . +PxPl2+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөгөҙмөлөр . +PxPl2+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 гөҙһөгөҙсө . +PxPl2+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнмен . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнменме . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнмендер . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнменмелер . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнменсе . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһең . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһеңме . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһеңдер . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһеңмелер . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһеңсе . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнбеҙ . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнбеҙме . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнбеҙҙер . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнбеҙмелер . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнбеҙсе . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһегеҙ . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһегеҙме . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһегеҙҙер . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһегеҙмелер . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 мдәрҙәнһегеҙсе . +PxSg1+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнмен . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнменме . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнмендер . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнменмелер . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнменсе . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһең . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһеңме . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg+Q
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһеңдер . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһеңмелер . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһеңсе . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Sg+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнбеҙ . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнбеҙме . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнбеҙҙер . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнбеҙмелер . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнбеҙсе . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred1Pl+Clt/сы
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһегеҙ . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһегеҙме . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl+Q
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһегеҙҙер . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһегеҙмелер . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl+Q+Indf
SFX 202 0 ңдәрҙәнһегеҙсе . +PxSg2+Pl+Abl+Pred2Pl+Clt/сы
